dev/adjective/adjective.ne.dix
  <!-- मायामयी; मायामयी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मायामयी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उकालो; उकालो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उकालो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पहिलो; पहिलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पहिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माइलो; माइल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="माइल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जना; जना; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जना__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चीसो; चीसो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चीसो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तामाङ्; तामाङ्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तामाङ्__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गनी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पश्चिम; पश्चिम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पश्चिम__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रष्ट; प्रष्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रष्ट__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फटाह; फटाह; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फटाह__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चौडो; चौड; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चौड/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भारतीय; भारतीय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भारतीय__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दोहोरो; दोहोरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दोहोरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सँगालो; सँगालो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सँगालो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हालोको; ह; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ह/ालोको__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लुका</l>
          <r>ालोको<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाँझो; बाँझो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बाँझो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धारो; धारो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धारो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भएजस्तो; भएजस्तो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भएजस्तो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्यानो; स्यानो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्यानो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कल्कलाउँदो; कल्कलाउँद; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कल्कलाउँद/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्थापना; स्थाप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्थाप/ना__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ित</l>
          <r>ना<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निर्दो; निर्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निर्/दो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>धा</l>
          <r>दो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झुट्टो; झुट्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झुट्ट/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विद्युतीय; विद्युतीय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विद्युतीय__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्बन्ध; सम्बन्ध; 2 -->
    <pardef n="सम्बन्ध__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ित</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झूठो; झूठो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झूठो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्थान; स्थान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्थान__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीय</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- राम्रो-नराम्रो; राम्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राम्र/ो-नराम्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-नराम्रा</l>
          <r>ो-नराम्रो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नाङ्गो; नाङ्ग; 2 -->
    <pardef n="नाङ्ग/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मसीनो; मसीनो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मसीनो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिङ्गो; सिङ्गो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सिङ्गो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सामाजिक; सामाजिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सामाजिक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दोस्रो; दोस्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दोस्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रवाफिलो; रवाफिलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रवाफिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साधारण; साधारण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साधारण__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हल्लो; हल्लो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हल्लो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संलग्न; संलग्न; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संलग्न__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अर्घेलो; अर्घेल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अर्घेल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धूलो; धूलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धूलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अग्लो; अग्ल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="अग्ल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मीठो; मीठो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मीठो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भित्रिनी; भित्रिनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भित्रिनी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="मायामयी"><i>मायामयी</i><par n="मायामयी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उकालो"><i>उकालो</i><par n="उकालो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिलो"><i>पहिलो</i><par n="पहिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="माइलो"><i>माइल</i><par n="माइल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जना"><i>जना</i><par n="जना__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चीसो"><i>चीसो</i><par n="चीसो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तामाङ्"><i>तामाङ्</i><par n="तामाङ्__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पश्चिम"><i>पश्चिम</i><par n="पश्चिम__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रष्ट"><i>प्रष्ट</i><par n="प्रष्ट__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फटाह"><i>फटाह</i><par n="फटाह__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चौडो"><i>चौड</i><par n="चौड/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भारतीय"><i>भारतीय</i><par n="भारतीय__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दोहोरो"><i>दोहोरो</i><par n="दोहोरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सँगालो"><i>सँगालो</i><par n="सँगालो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हालोको"><i>ह</i><par n="ह/ालोको__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बाँझो"><i>बाँझो</i><par n="बाँझो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="धारो"><i>धारो</i><par n="धारो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भएजस्तो"><i>भएजस्तो</i><par n="भएजस्तो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="स्यानो"><i>स्यानो</i><par n="स्यानो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कल्कलाउँदो"><i>कल्कलाउँद</i><par n="कल्कलाउँद/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="स्थापना"><i>स्थाप</i><par n="स्थाप/ना__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="निर्दो"><i>निर्</i><par n="निर्/दो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="झुट्टो"><i>झुट्ट</i><par n="झुट्ट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विद्युतीय"><i>विद्युतीय</i><par n="विद्युतीय__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्बन्ध"><i>सम्बन्ध</i><par n="सम्बन्ध__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="झूठो"><i>झूठो</i><par n="झूठो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="स्थान"><i>स्थान</i><par n="स्थान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="राम्रो-नराम्रो"><i>राम्र</i><par n="राम्र/ो-नराम्रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नाङ्गो"><i>नाङ्ग</i><par n="नाङ्ग/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मसीनो"><i>मसीनो</i><par n="मसीनो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सिङ्गो"><i>सिङ्गो</i><par n="सिङ्गो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सामाजिक"><i>सामाजिक</i><par n="सामाजिक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दोस्रो"><i>दोस्रो</i><par n="दोस्रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="रवाफिलो"><i>रवाफिलो</i><par n="रवाफिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="साधारण"><i>साधारण</i><par n="साधारण__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हल्लो"><i>हल्लो</i><par n="हल्लो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संलग्न"><i>संलग्न</i><par n="संलग्न__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अर्घेलो"><i>अर्घेल</i><par n="अर्घेल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="धूलो"><i>धूलो</i><par n="धूलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अग्लो"><i>अग्ल</i><par n="अग्ल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मीठो"><i>मीठो</i><par n="मीठो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भित्रिनी"><i>भित्रिनी</i><par n="भित्रिनी__adj"/></e>
